Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 22 Poultry Contract Growers or Producers

Cross references.

Live poultry dealers, brokers, and market operators, §

4-4-80

et seq.

2-22-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Contract grower or contract producer” means a producer of poultry who holds a legal interest in a contract operation and who produces poultry under a production contract at that contract operation.

“Integrator or processor” means a person who owns poultry that is produced by a contract grower or contract producer or who is engaged in the business of manufacturing goods from poultry, including by slaughtering or processing poultry.

“Production contract” means an agreement executed by an integrator or processor that provides for the production of poultry or the provision of management services relating to the production of poultry by a contract grower or contract producer in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-22-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 688, § 1.

2-22-2.
Voidability of contracts by contract growers or producers; right and notice of cancellation.

Any production contract entered into, extended, renewed, or amended on or after July 1, 2004, shall be voidable by the contract grower or contract producer if:

The contract grower or contract producer has not been afforded the opportunity to have the proposed production contract reviewed outside the business premises of the integrator or processor or its agents by an attorney or adviser of the contract grower’s or contract producer’s choosing for at least three business days prior to execution; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to the mere extension or renewal of an existing contract with no change in material terms from the existing contract other than the period covered thereby;

The contract does not quote the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section; or

The contract is not signed by all parties before chicks are placed with the contract grower or contract producer.

Unless waived in writing by the contract grower or contract producer at the time of signing a production contract, the contract grower or contract producer shall have a right to cancel a production contract until 12:00 Midnight of the third business day after the day on which he or she signs the contract or until chicks have been placed with the contract grower or contract producer, whichever occurs first.

Notice of cancellation under this subsection shall be given in writing to the integrator or processor at the place of business as set forth in the production contract by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, which shall be posted before termination of the right to cancel under paragraph (1) of this subsection. Notice of such written cancellation need not include any particular words or phrases to be effective so long as it indicates the intention of the contract grower or contract producer not to be bound by the production contract.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-22-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 688, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “July 1, 2004,” was substituted for “the effective date of this chapter” in subsection (a).

2-22-3.
Provision of statistical information and data to determine compensation.

Any integrator or processor shall provide to any contract grower or contract producer upon request thereby any statistical information and data used to determine compensation paid to such contract grower or contract producer under a production contract, other than a trade secret as defined by Code Section 10-1-761.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-22-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 688, § 1.

2-22-4.
Weighing and measuring of poultry.

Any contract grower or contract producer or the designee thereof shall have the right to be present at the weighing of poultry produced by such grower or producer, be present at the weighing of feed delivered by the integrator or processor, and observe the weights and measures used to determine compensation due such grower or producer under a production contract.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-22-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 688, § 1.

2-22-5.
Application of Fair Business Practices Act.

Violations of the provisions of Code Section 2-22-3 or 2-22-4 shall be subject to the same civil remedies and in the same manner as provided by Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, the “Fair Business Practices Act of 1975,” for persons whose business or property has been injured or damaged as a result of an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of subsection (a) of Code Section 10-1-393.

The provisions of Code Section 2-22-3 or 2-22-4 may be enforced by the Commissioner in the same manner as provided by Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, the “Fair Business Practices Act of 1975,” for enforcement of the provisions of said part by the Attorney General against a person reasonably appearing to have engaged in an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of subsection (a) of Code Section 10-1-393, and the superior courts may grant injunctive relief and impose the same civil penalties for violations of injunctions as provided in said part.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-22-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 688, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 12/SB 148.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “an” was inserted preceding “unfair” in subsection (b).